Ohio, session 136, SB477.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 4507.11, 4508.02, 4511.01, 4511.20, 4511.514, 4511.522, and 4511.54 be amended and sections 4503.184 and 4508.081 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4503.184. (A) As used in this section, "electric bicycle" and "low-speed micromobility device" have the same meanings as in section 4511.01 of the Revised Code. (B) Beginning six months after the effective date of this section, no person shall operate an electric bicycle or a low-speed micromobility device on a public road or highway unless the electric bicycle or low-speed micromobility device is registered in accordance with this section. (C)(1) The owner of an electric bicycle or a low-speed micromobility device shall file an application for registration of the electric bicycle or low-speed micromobility device with the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar. The registrar shall establish the form of the application, which shall include all of the following: (a) The name and residence or business address, as applicable, of the owner; (b) A brief description of the electric bicycle or low-speed micromobility device; (c) The name of any other authorized operator of the electric bicycle or low-speed micromobility device; (d) Proof that the owner and each authorized operator have one of the following: (i) A valid driver's license, commercial driver's license, motorized bicycle license, temporary instruction permit, or motorcycle operator's license; (ii) A completion certificate certifying that the person has completed an electric device safety course administered by the department of public safety or an authorized third-party entity in accordance with division (A) or (C) of section 4508.081 of the Revised Code; (iii) Documented evidence that the person completed an electric device safety course administered by a municipal corporation in accordance with division (D) of section 4508.081 of the Revised Code. The application shall be signed by the owner of the electric bicycle or low-speed micromobility device and shall be accompanied by the fee as provided in division (C)(2) of this section. (2) The registrar or deputy registrar shall collect a license fee of twenty-five dollars for the issuance of the electric bicycle or low-speed micromobility device registration. The registrar shall deposit all fees received under this division into the public safety - highway purposes fund established in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. (3) The registrar shall not require a business entity that operates an electric bicycle or low-speed micromobility rental service or sharing program to provide the information specified in division (C)(1)(c) or (d) of this section. (D) Upon receipt of the completed application and fee, the registrar shall issue to the applicant the appropriate certificate of registration for the electric bicycle or low-speed micromobility device and a registration sticker that displays the county of registration and the serial number of the electric bicycle or low-speed micromobility device. (E)(1) The owner of an electric bicycle or a low-speed micromobility device registered under this section shall display the registration sticker issued under division (D) of this section in plain view on the head tube of the electric bicycle or low-speed micromobility device. (2) A registration sticker is valid without renewal, provided the electric bicycle or a low-speed micromobility device for which it was issued is in existence and is owned by the person issued the registration sticker. If the owner transfers ownership of the electric bicycle or low-speed micromobility device, the transferor shall surrender the registration sticker to the registrar. (3) In the event of the loss, mutilation, or destruction of any registration sticker required by this section, the owner may obtain from the registrar, or from a deputy registrar if authorized by the registrar, a replacement registration sticker previously issued for the electric bicycle or a low-speed micromobility device. The director shall determine the cost of a replacement registration sticker issued under this section. (4) The registrar may revoke any registration sticker issued under this section, for cause shown and after a hearing, for failure of the applicant to comply with this section. Upon revocation, a registration sticker shall be surrendered. (F) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (G)(1) If an offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two or more violations of this section, the court, in addition to or independent of all other penalties imposed for the violation, may impound the electric bicycle or low-speed micromobility device for not more than thirty days. (2) If the court orders the impoundment of the electric bicycle or low-speed micromobility device, the court may assess storage fees of not more than five dollars per day, provided the total storage, processing, and release fees assessed in connection with the impoundment or subsequent release shall not exceed fifty dollars. (H) The offense established under division (B) of this section is a strict liability offense and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does not apply. The designation of this offense as a strict liability offense shall not be construed to imply that any other offense, for which there is no specified degree of culpability, is not a strict liability offense. Sec. 4507.11. (A)(1) Except as provided in section 4507.112 of the Revised Code, the registrar of motor vehicles shall conduct all necessary examinations of applicants for temporary instruction permits, drivers' licenses, motorcycle operators' endorsements, or motor-driven cycle or motor scooter endorsements. The examination shall include a test of the applicant's knowledge of motor vehicle laws, including the laws governing stopping for school buses, safely operating a motor vehicle adjacent to pedestrians and bicyclists, including those operating electric bicycles, and use of an electronic wireless communications device while operating a motor vehicle, a test of the applicant's physical fitness to drive, and a test of the applicant's ability to understand highway traffic control devices. The registrar may conduct the examination in such a manner that applicants who are illiterate or limited in their knowledge of the English language are tested by methods that would indicate to the examining officer that the applicant has a reasonable knowledge of motor vehicle laws and understands highway traffic control devices. (2) An applicant for a driver's license shall give an actual demonstration of the ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle by driving a motor vehicle under the supervision of an examining officer; however, no applicant for a driver's license shall use a low-speed or under-speed vehicle or a mini-truck for the purpose of demonstrating ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control over a vehicle. The demonstration shall consist of a maneuverability test and a road test. The director of public safety shall determine the formats of the tests. (3) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, an applicant for a motorcycle operator's endorsement or a restricted license that permits only the operation of a motorcycle shall give an actual demonstration of the ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motorcycle by driving a motorcycle under the supervision of an examining officer. However, no applicant for such an endorsement or restricted license shall use a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter for the purpose of demonstrating ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motorcycle. (4) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, an applicant for a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter operator's endorsement or a restricted license that permits only the operation of a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter shall give an actual demonstration of the ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter by driving a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter under the supervision of an examining officer. (5) Except as provided in sections 4507.112 and 4507.12 of the Revised Code, the registrar shall designate the highway patrol, any law enforcement body, or any other employee of the department of public safety to supervise and conduct examinations for temporary instruction permits, drivers' licenses, and motorcycle operators' endorsements and shall provide the necessary rules and forms to properly conduct the examinations. A deputy registrar shall forward to the registrar the records of the examinations, together with the application for a temporary instruction permit, driver's license, or motorcycle operator's endorsement. If in the opinion of the registrar the applicant is qualified to operate a motor vehicle, the registrar shall issue the permit, license, or endorsement. (6) The registrar may authorize the highway patrol, other designated law enforcement body, or other designated employee of the department of public safety to issue an examiner's driving permit to an applicant who has passed the required examination, authorizing that applicant to operate a motor vehicle while the registrar is completing an investigation relative to that applicant's qualifications to receive a temporary instruction permit, driver's license, or motorcycle operator's endorsement. The applicant shall keep the examiner's driving permit in the applicant's immediate possession while operating a motor vehicle. The examiner's driving permit is effective until final action and notification has been given by the registrar, but in no event longer than sixty days from its date of issuance. (B)(1) An applicant for a motorcycle operator's endorsement or a restricted license that permits only the operation of a motorcycle who presents to the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar a form approved by the director of public safety attesting to the applicant's successful completion within the preceding sixty days of a course of basic instruction provided by the motorcycle safety and education program approved by the director pursuant to section 4508.08 of the Revised Code shall not be required to give an actual demonstration of the ability to operate a motorcycle by driving a motorcycle under the supervision of an examining officer, as described in division (A) of this section. An applicant for a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter operator's endorsement or a restricted license that permits only the operation of a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter who presents to the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar a form approved by the director of public safety attesting to the applicant's successful completion within the preceding sixty days of a course of basic instruction provided by the motorcycle safety and education program approved by the director pursuant to section 4508.08 of the Revised Code shall not be required to give an actual demonstration of the ability to operate a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter by driving a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter under the supervision of an examining officer, as described in division (A) of this section. Upon presentation of the form described in division (B)(1) of this section and compliance with all other requirements relating to the issuance of a motorcycle operator's endorsement or a restricted license that permits only the operation of a motorcycle, the registrar or deputy registrar shall issue to the applicant the endorsement or restricted license, as the case may be. (2) A person who has not attained eighteen years of age and presents an application for a motorcycle operator's endorsement or a restricted license under division (B)(1) of this section also shall comply with the requirements of section 4507.21 of the Revised Code. (C) A person who holds a valid motorcycle endorsement or restricted license that permits only the operation of a motorcycle may operate a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter with that endorsement or restricted license. Sec. 4508.02. (A)(1) The director of public safety, subject to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt and prescribe such rules concerning the administration and enforcement of this chapter as are necessary to protect the public. The rules shall require an assessment of the holder of a probationary instructor license. The director shall inspect the school facilities and equipment of applicants and licensees and examine applicants for instructor's licenses. (2) The director shall adopt rules governing online driver education courses that may be completed via the internet to satisfy the classroom instruction under division (C) of this section. The rules shall do all of the following: (a) Establish standards that an online driver training enterprise must satisfy to be licensed to offer an online driver education course via the internet, including, at a minimum, proven expertise in providing driver education and an acceptable infrastructure capable of providing secure online driver education in accord with advances in internet technology. The rules shall allow an online driver training enterprise to be affiliated with a licensed driver training school offering in-person classroom instruction, but shall not require such an affiliation. (b) Establish content requirements that an online driver education course must satisfy to be approved as equivalent to twenty-four hours of in-person classroom instruction; (c) Establish attendance standards, including a maximum number of course hours that may be completed in a twenty-four-hour period; (d) Allow an enrolled applicant to begin the required eight hours of actual behind-the-wheel instruction upon completing all twenty-four hours of course instruction; (e) Establish any other requirements necessary to regulate online driver education. (B) The director shall administer and enforce this chapter. (C) The rules shall require twenty-four hours of completed in-person classroom instruction or the completion of an approved, equivalent online driver education course offered via the internet by a licensed online driver training enterprise, followed by eight hours of actual behind-the-wheel instruction conducted on public streets and highways of this state for all beginning drivers of noncommercial motor vehicles who are required to complete the training under section 4507.21 of the Revised Code. The rules shall allow beginning drivers of noncommercial motor vehicles to complete the driver education course at any point while holding a valid temporary instruction permit. The rules also shall require the classroom instruction or online driver education course for such drivers to include instruction on both all of the following: (1) The dangers of driving a motor vehicle while distracted, including while using an electronic wireless communications device, or engaging in any other activity that distracts a driver from the safe and effective operation of a motor vehicle; (2) The dangers of driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of a controlled substance, prescription medication, or alcohol; (3) The laws for sharing the roadway with a pedestrian and the operator of a bicycle or an electric bicycle, including hand and arm signals, right-of-way rules, and passing protocols; (4) The safety method, commonly referred to as the Dutch reach method, that instructs a person to use the hand that is furthest from the car door to open the door, thereby forcing the person's body to swivel and check for oncoming cyclists and other vulnerable road users. (D) The rules shall state the minimum hours for classroom and behind-the-wheel instruction required for beginning drivers of commercial trucks, commercial cars, buses, and commercial tractors, trailers, and semitrailers. (E)(1) The department of public safety may charge a fee to each online driver training enterprise in an amount sufficient to pay the actual expenses the department incurs in the regulation of online driver education courses. (2) The department shall supply to each licensed online driver training enterprise certificates to be used for certifying an applicant's enrollment in an approved online driver education course and a separate certificate to be issued upon successful completion of an approved online driver education course. The certificates shall be numbered serially. The department may charge a fee to each online driver training enterprise per certificate supplied to pay the actual expenses the department incurs in supplying the certificates. (F) The director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing an abbreviated driver training course for adults. Sec. 4508.081. (A) Not later than three months after the effective date of this section, the director of public safety shall create and administer an electric device safety course. The course may be conducted through in-person classroom instruction or online. The course shall include instruction concerning all of the following: (1) The safe operation of electric bicycles, low-speed micromobility devices, and electric personal assistive mobility devices on public streets, highways, sidewalks, shared-use paths, and any portions of roadways set aside for the exclusive use of bicycles; (2) Examples of resolutions, ordinances, or rules from counties, townships, municipal corporations, or other local authorities or state agencies regarding the operation of electric bicycles, low-speed micromobility devices, and electric personal assistive mobility devices within their jurisdictions and how to find such local laws; (3) Parental liability, including financial responsibility, related to the operation of electric bicycles, low-speed micromobility devices, and electric personal assistive mobility devices by the parent's child or any other minor under the person's legal protection; (4) Any other kind of instruction the director determines is appropriate. (B) The director may charge a reasonable fee, as determined by the director, for the electric device safety course. All fees collected by the director shall be deposited into the public safety - highway purposes fund created in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. The director shall issue a certificate of completion to each person who successfully completes an electric device safety course. (C) The director may authorize one or more third-party entities to offer the electric device safety course without fee restrictions, but such entities are not eligible for reimbursement of expenses or subsidies from the public safety - highway purposes fund created in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. Any third-party entity shall ensure that the electric device safety course meets the standards established in rules adopted by the director in accordance with division (E) of this section. (D) In lieu of completing the electric device safety course administered by the director or an authorized third-party entity, a person may complete an electric safety device course that is administered by a municipal corporation if such course has been approved by the director. The director shall approve a municipal corporation's electric safety device course if it meets the instruction requirements described in division (A) of this section. The director shall post on the department of public safety's web site a list of approved courses that are administered by municipal corporations. (E) The director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for the administration of this section. Such rules shall establish standards for the electric device safety course curriculum. Sec. 4511.01. As used in this chapter and in Chapter 4513. of the Revised Code: (A) "Vehicle" means every device, including a bicycle, motorized bicycle, and an electric bicycle, in, upon, or by which any person or property may be transported or drawn upon a highway. "Vehicle" does not include any motorized wheelchair, any electric personal assistive mobility device, any low-speed micromobility device, any personal delivery device as defined in section 4511.513 of the Revised Code, any device that is moved by power collected from overhead electric trolley wires or that is used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks, or any device that is moved by human power. (B) "Motor vehicle" means every vehicle propelled or drawn by power other than muscular power or power collected from overhead electric trolley wires, except motorized bicycles, electric bicycles, road rollers, traction engines, power shovels, power cranes, and other equipment used in construction work and not designed for or employed in general highway transportation, hole-digging machinery, well-drilling machinery, ditch-digging machinery, farm machinery, and trailers designed and used exclusively to transport a boat between a place of storage and a marina, or in and around a marina, when drawn or towed on a street or highway for a distance of no more than ten miles and at a speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less. (C) "Motorcycle" means every motor vehicle, other than a tractor, having a seat or saddle for the use of the operator and designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, including, but not limited to, motor vehicles known as "motor-driven cycle," "motor scooter," "autocycle," "cab-enclosed motorcycle," or "motorcycle" without regard to weight or brake horsepower. (D) "Emergency vehicle" means emergency vehicles of municipal, township, or county departments or public utility corporations when identified as such as required by law, the director of public safety, or local authorities, and motor vehicles when commandeered by a police officer. (E) "Public safety vehicle" means any of the following: (1) Ambulances, including private ambulance companies under contract to a municipal corporation, township, or county, and private ambulances and nontransport vehicles bearing license plates issued under section 4503.49 of the Revised Code; (2) Motor vehicles used by public law enforcement officers or other persons sworn to enforce the criminal and traffic laws of the state; (3) Any motor vehicle when properly identified as required by the director of public safety, when used in response to fire emergency calls or to provide emergency medical service to ill or injured persons, and when operated by a duly qualified person who is a member of a volunteer rescue service or a volunteer fire department, and who is on duty pursuant to the rules or directives of that service. The state fire marshal shall be designated by the director of public safety as the certifying agency for all public safety vehicles described in division (E)(3) of this section. (4) Vehicles used by fire departments, including motor vehicles when used by volunteer fire fighters responding to emergency calls in the fire department service when identified as required by the director of public safety. Any vehicle used to transport or provide emergency medical service to an ill or injured person, when certified as a public safety vehicle, shall be considered a public safety vehicle when transporting an ill or injured person to a hospital regardless of whether such vehicle has already passed a hospital. (5) Vehicles used by the motor carrier enforcement unit for the enforcement of orders and rules of the public utilities commission as specified in section 5503.34 of the Revised Code. (F) "School bus" means every bus designed for carrying more than nine passengers that is owned by a public, private, or governmental agency or institution of learning and operated for the transportation of children to or from a school session or a school function, or owned by a private person and operated for compensation for the transportation of children to or from a school session or a school function. "School bus" does not include any of the following: (1) A bus operated by a municipally owned transportation system, a mass transit company operating exclusively within the territorial limits of a municipal corporation, or within such limits and the territorial limits of municipal corporations immediately contiguous to such municipal corporation, nor a common passenger carrier certified by the public utilities commission unless such bus is devoted exclusively to the transportation of children to and from a school session or a school function; (2) A van or bus used by a licensed child care center or type A family child care home to transport children from the child care center or type A family child care home to a school if the van or bus does not have more than fifteen children in the van or bus at any time; (3) An alternative vehicle as defined in section 4511.76 of the Revised Code. (G) "Bicycle" means a pedal-powered vehicle upon which a human operator sits, including an electric bicycle. (H) "Motorized bicycle" or "moped" means any vehicle having either two tandem wheels or one wheel in the front and two wheels in the rear, that may be pedaled, and that is equipped with a helper motor of not more than fifty cubic centimeters piston displacement that produces not more than one brake horsepower and is capable of propelling the vehicle at a speed of not greater than twenty miles per hour on a level surface. "Motorized bicycle" or "moped" does not include an electric bicycle. (I) "Commercial tractor" means every motor vehicle having motive power designed or used for drawing other vehicles and not so constructed as to carry any load thereon, or designed or used for drawing other vehicles while carrying a portion of such other vehicles, or load thereon, or both. (J) "Agricultural tractor" and "traction engine" mean every self-propelling vehicle designed or used for drawing other vehicles or wheeled machinery but having no provision for carrying loads independently of such other vehicles, and used principally for agricultural purposes. (K) "Truck" means every motor vehicle, except trailers and semitrailers, designed and used to carry property. (L) "Bus" means every motor vehicle designed for carrying more than nine passengers and used for the transportation of persons other than in a ridesharing arrangement, and every motor vehicle, automobile for hire, or funeral car, other than a taxicab or motor vehicle used in a ridesharing arrangement, designed and used for the transportation of persons for compensation. (M) "Trailer" means every vehicle designed or used for carrying persons or property wholly on its own structure and for being drawn by a motor vehicle, including any such vehicle when formed by or operated as a combination of a "semitrailer" and a vehicle of the dolly type, such as that commonly known as a "trailer dolly," a vehicle used to transport agricultural produce or agricultural production materials between a local place of storage or supply and the farm when drawn or towed on a street or highway at a speed greater than twenty-five miles per hour, and a vehicle designed and used exclusively to transport a boat between a place of storage and a marina, or in and around a marina, when drawn or towed on a street or highway for a distance of more than ten miles or at a speed of more than twenty-five miles per hour. (N) "Semitrailer" means every vehicle designed or used for carrying persons or property with another and separate motor vehicle so that in operation a part of its own weight or that of its load, or both, rests upon and is carried by another vehicle. (O) "Pole trailer" means every trailer or semitrailer attached to the towing vehicle by means of a reach, pole, or by being boomed or otherwise secured to the towing vehicle, and ordinarily used for transporting long or irregular shaped loads such as poles, pipes, or structural members capable, generally, of sustaining themselves as beams between the supporting connections. (P) "Railroad" means a carrier of persons or property operating upon rails or tracks placed principally on a private right-of-way. (Q) "Train" means one or more locomotives coupled, with or without cars, that operates on rails or tracks and to which all other traffic is required by law to yield the right-of-way at highway-rail grade crossings. (R) "Streetcar" means a car, other than a train, for transporting persons or property, operated upon rails principally within a street or highway. (S) "Trackless trolley" means every car that collects its power from overhead electric trolley wires and that is not operated upon rails or tracks. (T) "Explosives" means any chemical compound or mechanical mixture that is intended for the purpose of producing an explosion that contains any oxidizing and combustible units or other ingredients in such proportions, quantities, or packing that an ignition by fire, by friction, by concussion, by percussion, or by a detonator of any part of the compound or mixture may cause such a sudden generation of highly heated gases that the resultant gaseous pressures are capable of producing destructive effects on contiguous objects, or of destroying life or limb. Manufactured articles shall not be held to be explosives when the individual units contain explosives in such limited quantities, of such nature, or in such packing, that it is impossible to procure a simultaneous or a destructive explosion of such units, to the injury of life, limb, or property by fire, by friction, by concussion, by percussion, or by a detonator, such as fixed ammunition for small arms, firecrackers, or safety fuse matches. (U) "Flammable liquid" means any liquid that has a flash point of seventy degrees fahrenheit, or less, as determined by a tagliabue or equivalent closed cup test device. (V) "Gross weight" means the weight of a vehicle plus the weight of any load thereon. (W) "Person" means every natural person, firm, co-partnership, association, or corporation. (X) "Pedestrian" means any person on foot, in a motorized or non-motorized wheelchair, or using another equivalent device, such as skates or a skateboard. "Pedestrian" includes a personal delivery device as defined in section 4511.513 of the Revised Code unless the context clearly suggests otherwise. (Y) "Driver or operator" means every person who drives or is in actual physical control of a vehicle, trackless trolley, or streetcar. (Z) "Police officer" means every officer authorized to direct or regulate traffic, or to make arrests for violations of traffic regulations. (AA) "Local authorities" means every county, municipal, and other local board or body having authority to adopt police regulations under the constitution and laws of this state. (BB) "Street" or "highway" means a general term for denoting a public way for purposes of travel by vehicles, streetcars, trackless trolleys, and vulnerable road users, including the entire area within the right-of-way. (CC) "Controlled-access highway" means every street or highway in respect to which owners or occupants of abutting lands and other persons have no legal right of access to or from the same except at such points only and in such manner as may be determined by the public authority having jurisdiction over such street or highway. (DD) "Private road" means every way or place in private ownership used for vehicular travel by the owner and those having express or implied permission from the owner but not by other persons. (EE) "Roadway" means that portion of a highway improved, designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel and parking lanes, not including the berm, sidewalk, or shoulder, even if the berm, sidewalk, or shoulder is used by a person operating a bicycle or other human-powered vehicle. If a highway includes two or more separate roadways the term "roadway" means any such roadway separately but not all such roadways collectively. (FF) "Sidewalk" means that portion of a street between the curb lines, or the lateral lines of a roadway, and the adjacent property lines or easements of private property, that is paved or improved, and is intended for the use of pedestrians. (GG) "Laned highway" means a highway the roadway of which is divided into two or more clearly marked lanes for vehicular traffic. (HH) "Through highway" means every street or highway as provided in section 4511.65 of the Revised Code. (II) "State highway" means a highway under the jurisdiction of the department of transportation, outside the limits of municipal corporations, provided that the authority conferred upon the director of transportation in section 5511.01 of the Revised Code to erect state highway route markers and signs directing traffic shall not be modified by sections 4511.01 to 4511.79 and 4511.99 of the Revised Code. (JJ) "State route" means every highway that is designated with an official state route number and so marked. (KK) "Intersection" means: (1) The area embraced within the prolongation or connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two highways that join one another at, or approximately at, right angles, or the area within which vehicles traveling upon different highways that join at any other angle might come into conflict. The junction of an alley, driveway, or site roadway open to public travel with a public roadway or highway does not constitute an intersection, unless the public roadway or highway at the junction is controlled by a traffic control device. (2) If a highway includes two roadways separated by a median, then every crossing of each roadway of such divided highway by an intersecting highway constitutes a separate intersection if the opposing left-turn paths cross and there is sufficient interior storage for the design vehicle. As used in this division, "design vehicle" means the longest vehicle authorized under section 5577.05 of the Revised Code to operate on that roadway without a permit. (3) At a location controlled by a highway traffic signal, regardless of the distance between the separate intersections as described in division (KK)(2) of this section: (a) If a stop line, yield line, or crosswalk has not been designated on the roadway within the median between the separate intersections, the two intersections and the roadway and median constitute one intersection. (b) Where a stop line, yield line, or crosswalk is designated on the roadway on the intersection approach, the area within the crosswalk and any area beyond the designated stop line or yield line constitute part of the intersection. (c) Where a crosswalk is designated on a roadway on the departure from the intersection, the intersection includes the area that extends to the far side of the crosswalk. (LL) "Crosswalk" means: (1) That part of a roadway at an intersection included within the connections of the lateral lines of the sidewalks on opposite sides of the highway measured from the curbs, or, in the absence of curbs, from the edges of the traversable roadway, and in the absence of a sidewalk on one side of the roadway, the part of a roadway included within the extension of the lateral lines of the sidewalk at right angles to the center line; (2) Any portion of a roadway at an intersection or elsewhere, distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings on the surface, which might be supplemented by contrasting pavement texture, style, or color; (3) Notwithstanding divisions (LL)(1) and (2) of this section, "crosswalk" does not include an area where local authorities have placed signs indicating no crossing. (MM) "Safety zone" means the area or space officially set apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and protected or marked or indicated by adequate signs as to be plainly visible at all times. (NN) "Business district" means the territory fronting upon a street or highway, including the street or highway, between successive intersections within municipal corporations where fifty per cent or more of the frontage between such successive intersections is occupied by buildings in use for business, or within or outside municipal corporations where fifty per cent or more of the frontage for a distance of three hundred feet or more is occupied by buildings in use for business, and the character of such territory is indicated by official traffic control devices. (OO) "Residence district" means the territory, not comprising a business district, fronting on a street or highway, including the street or highway, where, for a distance of three hundred feet or more, the frontage is improved with residences or residences and buildings in use for business. (PP) "Urban district" means the territory contiguous to and including any street or highway which is built up with structures devoted to business, industry, or dwelling houses situated at intervals of less than one hundred feet for a distance of a quarter of a mile or more, and the character of such territory is indicated by official traffic control devices. (QQ) "Traffic control device" means a flagger, sign, signal, marking, channelization device, or other device that uses colors, shapes, symbols, words, sounds, or tactile information for the primary purpose of communicating a regulatory, warning, or guidance message to road users on a street, highway, site roadway open to public travel, pedestrian facility, bikeway, or pathway. (RR) "Traffic control signal" means a highway traffic signal placed at an intersection, movable bridge, fire station, midblock crosswalk, alternating one-way sections of a single lane road, private driveway, or other location that requires conflicting traffic to be directed to stop and permitted to proceed in an orderly manner. "Traffic control signal" includes a vehicular signal indication, a pedestrian signal indication, and a bicycle symbol signal indication. "Traffic control signal" does not include an emergency-vehicle hybrid beacon or a pedestrian hybrid beacon. (SS) "Railroad sign or signal" means any sign, signal, or device erected by authority of a public body or official or by a railroad and intended to give notice of the presence of railroad tracks or the approach of a train. (TT) "Traffic" means pedestrians, ridden or herded animals, vehicles, streetcars, trackless trolleys, and other devices, either singly or together, while using for purposes of travel any highway or site roadway open to public travel. (UU) "Right-of-way" means either of the following, as the context requires: (1) The right of a vehicle, streetcar, trackless trolley, or pedestrian to proceed uninterruptedly in a lawful manner in the direction in which it or the individual is moving in preference to another vehicle, streetcar, trackless trolley, or pedestrian approaching from a different direction into its or the individual's path; (2) A general term denoting land, property, or the interest therein, usually in the configuration of a strip, acquired for or devoted to transportation purposes. When used in this context, right-of-way includes the roadway, shoulders or berm, ditch, and slopes extending to the right-of-way limits under the control of the state or local authority. (VV) "Rural mail delivery vehicle" means every vehicle used to deliver United States mail on a rural mail delivery route. (WW) "Funeral escort vehicle" means any motor vehicle, including a funeral hearse, while used to facilitate the movement of a funeral procession. (XX) "Alley" means a street or highway intended to provide access to the rear or side of lots or buildings in urban districts and not intended for the purpose of through vehicular traffic, and includes any street or highway that has been declared an "alley" by the legislative authority of the municipal corporation in which such street or highway is located. (YY) "Freeway" means a divided multi-lane highway for through traffic with all crossroads separated in grade and with full control of access. (ZZ) "Expressway" means a divided arterial street or highway for through traffic with full or partial control of access with an excess of fifty per cent of all crossroads separated in grade. (AAA) "Thruway" means a through highway whose entire roadway is reserved for through traffic and on which roadway parking is prohibited. (BBB) "Stop intersection" means any intersection at one or more entrances of which stop signs are erected. (CCC) "Arterial street or highway" means a street or highway primarily used by through traffic, usually on a continuous route or a street or highway designated as part of an arterial system. (DDD) "Ridesharing arrangement" means the transportation of persons in a motor vehicle where such transportation is incidental to another purpose of a volunteer driver and includes ridesharing arrangements known as carpools, vanpools, and buspools. (EEE) "Motorized wheelchair" means any self-propelled vehicle designed for, and used by, a person with a disability and that is incapable of a speed in excess of eight miles per hour. (FFF) "Child care center" and "type A family child care home" have the same meanings as in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. (GGG) "Multi-wheel agricultural tractor" means a type of agricultural tractor that has two or more wheels or tires on each side of one axle at the rear of the tractor, is designed or used for drawing other vehicles or wheeled machinery, has no provision for carrying loads independently of the drawn vehicles or machinery, and is used principally for agricultural purposes. (HHH) "Operate" means to cause or have caused movement of a vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley. (III) "Predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense" means any of the following: (1) A violation of section 4511.03, 4511.051, 4511.12, 4511.132, 4511.16, 4511.20, 4511.201, 4511.21, 4511.211, 4511.213, 4511.22, 4511.23, 4511.25, 4511.26, 4511.27, 4511.28, 4511.29, 4511.30, 4511.31, 4511.32, 4511.33, 4511.34, 4511.35, 4511.36, 4511.37, 4511.38, 4511.39, 4511.40, 4511.41, 4511.42, 4511.43, 4511.431, 4511.432, 4511.44, 4511.441, 4511.451, 4511.452, 4511.46, 4511.47, 4511.48, 4511.481, 4511.49, 4511.50, 4511.511, 4511.514, 4511.522, 4511.53, 4511.54, 4511.55, 4511.56, 4511.57, 4511.58, 4511.59, 4511.60, 4511.61, 4511.64, 4511.66, 4511.661, 4511.68, 4511.70, 4511.701, 4511.71, 4511.711, 4511.712, 4511.713, 4511.72, 4511.73, 4511.763, 4511.771, 4511.78, or 4511.84 of the Revised Code; (2) A violation of division (A)(2) of section 4511.17, divisions (A) to (D) of section 4511.51, or division (A) of section 4511.74 of the Revised Code; (3) A violation of any provision of sections 4511.01 to 4511.76 of the Revised Code for which no penalty otherwise is provided in the section that contains the provision violated; (4) A violation of section 4511.214 of the Revised Code; (5) A violation of a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to any section or provision set forth or described in division (III)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section. (JJJ) "Road service vehicle" means wreckers, utility repair vehicles, and state, county, and municipal service vehicles equipped with visual signals by means of flashing, rotating, or oscillating lights. (KKK) "Beacon" means a highway traffic signal with one or more signal sections that operate in a flashing mode. (LLL) "Hybrid beacon" means a special type of beacon that is intentionally placed in a dark mode where no indications are displayed between periods of operation and, when operated, displays both steady and flashing highway traffic signal indications. "Hybrid beacon" includes both of the following: (1) An emergency-vehicle hybrid beacon used to warn and control traffic at an otherwise unsignalized location to assist authorized emergency vehicles in entering or crossing a street or highway; (2) A pedestrian hybrid beacon used to warn and control traffic at an otherwise unsignalized location to assist pedestrians in crossing a street or highway at a marked crosswalk. (MMM) "Highway traffic signal" means a power-operated traffic control device by which traffic is warned or directed to take some specific action. "Highway traffic signal" includes a beacon, an in-road warning light, a lane-use control signal, and a traffic control signal. "Highway traffic signal" does not include a power-operated sign, steadily illuminated pavement marker, gate, flashing light signal, warning light, or steady burning electric lamp. (NNN) "Median" means the portion of a highway separating opposing directions of the traveled way or the area between two roadways of a divided highway, measured from edge of traveled way to edge of traveled way. The median excludes turn lanes. The width of a median may be different between intersections, interchanges, and at opposite approaches of the same intersection. (OOO) "Site roadway open to public travel" means a roadway or bikeway on site of a shopping center, office park, airport, school, university, sports arena, recreational park, or other similar business, government, or recreation facility that is publicly or privately owned but where the public is allowed to travel without full-time access restrictions. "Site roadway open to public travel" does not include a roadway where access is restricted at all times by gates or guards to residents, employees, or other specifically authorized persons, a parking area, a driving aisle within a parking area, or a private highway-rail grade crossing. (PPP) "Shared-use path" means a bikeway outside the traveled way and physically separated from motorized vehicular traffic by an open space or barrier and either within the highway right-of-way or within an independent alignment. A shared-use path also may be used by pedestrians, including skaters, joggers, users of manual and motorized wheelchairs, and other authorized motorized and non-motorized users. A shared-use path does not include any trail that is intended to be used primarily for mountain biking, hiking, equestrian use, or other similar uses, or any other single track or natural surface trail that has historically been reserved for nonmotorized use. (QQQ) "Highway maintenance vehicle" means a vehicle used in snow and ice removal or road surface maintenance, including a snow plow, traffic line striper, road sweeper, mowing machine, asphalt distributing vehicle, or other such vehicle designed for use in specific highway maintenance activities. (RRR) "Waste collection vehicle" means a vehicle used in the collection of garbage, refuse, trash, or recyclable materials. (SSS) "Electric bicycle" means a "class 1 electric bicycle," a "class 2 electric bicycle," or a "class 3 electric bicycle" as defined in this section. (TTT) "Class 1 electric bicycle" means a bicycle that is equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of less than seven hundred fifty watts that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour. (UUU) "Class 2 electric bicycle" means a bicycle that is equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of less than seven hundred fifty watts that may provide assistance regardless of whether the rider is pedaling and is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour. (VVV) "Class 3 electric bicycle" means a bicycle that is equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of less than seven hundred fifty watts that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty-eight miles per hour. (WWW) "Low-speed micromobility device" means a device weighing less than one hundred pounds that has handlebars, is propelled by an electric motor or human power, and has an attainable speed on a paved level surface of not more than twenty miles per hour when propelled by the electric motor. (XXX) "Natural resources officer" means an officer appointed pursuant to section 1501.24 of the Revised Code. (YYY) "Wildlife officer" means an officer designated pursuant to section 1531.13 of the Revised Code. (ZZZ) "In-road warning light" means a special type of highway traffic signal that is installed in the roadway surface to warn road users that they are approaching a condition on or adjacent to the roadway that might not be readily apparent and might require the road users to reduce speed or come to a complete stop. (AAAA) "Lane-use control signal" means a signal face or comparable display on a full-matrix changeable message sign that displays indications to permit or prohibit the use of specific lanes of a roadway or a shoulder where driving is sometimes authorized or to indicate the impending prohibition of such use. (BBBB) "Bicycle box" means a designated area on the approach to a signalized intersection, between an advance motorist stop line and the crosswalk or intersection, that is intended to provide bicyclists a visible location to wait in front of stopped motorists during the red signal phase. (CCCC) "Two-stage bicycle turn box" means a designated area at an intersection that is intended to provide bicyclists a place to wait for traffic to clear before proceeding in a different direction of travel. (DDDD) "Bicycle lane" means a portion of a roadway that has been designated for preferential or exclusive use by bicyclists and is often delineated from the adjacent general-purpose lanes by longitudinal pavement markings and either a bicycle lane symbol, words, or signs. "Bicycle lane" includes all of the following: (1) A buffer-separated bicycle lane, which is separated from the adjacent general-purpose lanes by a pattern of standard longitudinal pavement markings that are wider than a normal or wide-lane pavement marking; (2) A counter-flow bicycle lane, which is a one-directional bicycle lane that provides a lawful path of travel for bicycles in the opposite direction from the general traffic on a roadway that otherwise requires the general traffic to travel in only one direction. A counter-flow bicycle lane is designated by the traffic control devices used for other bicycle lanes; (3) A separated bicycle lane, which is an exclusive facility for bicyclists that is located within or directly adjacent to the roadway and is physically separated from the motor vehicle traffic with a vertical element. (EEEE) "Bicycle signal face" means a signal face that displays only bicycle symbol signal indications in accordance with section 4511.15 of the Revised Code, that exclusively controls a bicyclist's movement from a designated bicycle lane or from a separate facility, and that displays signal indications that are applicable only to a bicyclist's movement. (FFFF) "Bicycle signal sign" means a sign meant to inform road users that the signal indications in the bicycle signal face are intended only for bicyclists, and to inform bicyclists which bicyclist movements are controlled by that bicycle signal face. (GGGG) "Bikeway" means any road, street, path, or way that in some manner is specifically designated for bicycle travel, regardless of whether the facility is designated for the exclusive use of bicycles or if it is shared with other modes of transportation. (HHHH) "Busway" means a traveled way that is used exclusively by buses. (IIII) "Driveway" means an access from a roadway to a building, site, or abutting property. (JJJJ) "Roundabout" means a circular intersection with a yield control at each entry, which permits a vehicle on the circulatory roadway to proceed, with deflection of the approaching vehicles counter-clockwise around a central island. (KKKK) "Shoulder" means a longitudinal area contiguous with the traveled way that is used for accommodating vehicles that are stopped for an emergency and for lateral support of base and surface courses; graded for emergency stopping; either paved or unpaved; and when paved, may be open for part-time travel by some or all vehicles or may also be available for use by pedestrians or bicycles in the absence of other pedestrian or bicycle facilities. (LLLL) "Autocycle," "cab-enclosed motorcycle," "electronic," "farm machinery," "motor-driven cycle or motor scooter," "limited driving privileges," and "state" have the same meanings as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (MMMM) "Multifunction school activity bus" means a school bus whose purposes do not include transporting children to and from home or school bus stops. Sec. 4511.20. (A) No person shall operate a vehicle, trackless trolley, or streetcar, electric personal assistive mobility device, or low-speed micromobility device, on any street or highway in willful or wanton disregard of the safety of persons or property. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. (C)(1) If an offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two or more violations of this section or a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance, and the offender, in committing each violation, used an electric bicycle, electric personal assistive mobility device, or low-speed micromobility device, the court, in addition to or independent of all other penalties imposed for the violation, may impound the electric bicycle, electric personal assistive mobility device, or low-speed micromobility device for not more than thirty days. (2) If the court orders the impoundment of the electric bicycle, electric personal assistive mobility device, or low-speed micromobility device, the court may assess storage fees of not more than five dollars per day, provided the total storage, processing, and release fees assessed in connection with the impoundment or subsequent release shall not exceed fifty dollars. Sec. 4511.514. (A)(1) A low-speed micromobility device may be operated on the public streets, highways, sidewalks, and shared-use paths, and may be operated on any portions of roadways set aside for the exclusive use of bicycles in accordance with this section. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, those sections of this chapter that by their nature could apply to a low-speed micromobility device do apply to the device and the person operating it whenever it is operated upon any public street, highway, sidewalk, or shared-use path, or upon any portion of a roadway set aside for the exclusive use of bicycles. (B) No operator of a low-speed micromobility device shall do any of the following: (1) Fail to yield the right-of-way to all pedestrians at all times; (2) Fail to give an audible signal before overtaking and passing a pedestrian; (3) Operate the device at night unless the device or its operator is equipped with or wearing both of the following: (a) A lamp pointing to the front that emits a white light visible from a distance of not less than five hundred feet; (b) A red reflector facing the rear that is visible from all distances from one hundred feet to six hundred feet when directly in front of lawful lower beams of head lamps on a motor vehicle; (4) Operate the low-speed micromobility device unless the person is wearing a protective helmet that meets the standards established by the consumer product safety commission or the American society for testing and materials. (C)(1) No person who is under sixteen eighteen years of age shall rent a low-speed micromobility device. (2) No person shall knowingly rent a low-speed micromobility device to a person who is under sixteen eighteen years of age. (3) No person shall knowingly rent a low-speed micromobility device on behalf of a person who is under sixteen eighteen years of age. (D)(D)(1) No person shall operate a low-speed micromobility device atas follows: (a) At a speed greater than twenty miles per hour upon public streets, highways, or portions of roadways set aside for the exclusive use of bicycles; (b) At a speed greater than ten miles per hour upon a shared-use path or a path as described in division (C)(3) of section 4511.522 of the Revised Code; (c) At a speed greater than five miles per hour upon a sidewalk. (2) No person who is under fourteen years of age shall operate a low-speed micromobility device. (3) No person who is under eighteen years of age shall operate a low-speed micromobility device while carrying a passenger. (4) No person who is eighteen, nineteen, or twenty years of age shall operate a low-speed micromobility device while carrying a passenger who is under twelve years of age. (E)(1) Whoever (E) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. (F)(1) If an offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two or more violations of this section or a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance, the court, in addition to or independent of all other penalties imposed for the violation, may impound the low-speed micromobility device for not more than thirty days. (2) If the court orders the impoundment of the low-speed micromobility device, the court may assess storage fees of not more than five dollars per day, provided the total storage, processing, and release fees assessed in connection with the impoundment or subsequent release shall not exceed fifty dollars. (G) Unless a mens rea is otherwise specified in this section, an offense established under this section is a strict liability offense and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does not apply. The designation of that offense as a strict liability offense shall not be construed to imply that any other offense, for which there is no specified degree of culpability, is not a strict liability offense. (F)(H) Notwithstanding division (A)(1) of this section, a municipal corporation, county, township, metropolitan park district, township park district, recreation district, or any division of the department of natural resources if the division has the approval of the director of natural resources may do any of the following: (1) Regulate or prohibit the operation of low-speed micromobility devices on public streets, highways, sidewalks, and shared-use paths, and portions of roadways set aside for the exclusive use of bicycles, under its jurisdiction; (2) Include low-speed micromobility devices that are adapted to expand access for people with various physical limitations into a shared bicycle, shared electric bicycle, or similar vehicle sharing program, under its jurisdiction; (3) Require the owner or operator of a low-speed micromobility device rental service or low-speed micromobility device sharing program to maintain commercial general liability insurance related to the operation of the devices, with limits of up to one million dollars per occurrence and two million dollars per aggregate. Sec. 4511.522. (A)(1) On and after January 1, 2020, manufacturersManufacturers and distributors of electric bicycles shall permanently affix a label, in a prominent location, to each electric bicycle. The label shall specify whether the electric bicycle is a class 1, class 2, or class 3 electric bicycle, the top assisted speed that the electric bicycle is capable of reaching, and the motor wattage of the electric bicycle. (2) No person shall modify an electric bicycle in a manner that changes the top assisted speed that the electric bicycle is capable of reaching unless the person also modifies the label required under division (A)(1) of this section to reflect the modification. (3) No person shall knowingly sell at retail an electric bicycle without giving the purchaser, either on paper or electronically, a copy of the educational leaflet or pamphlet created by the department of transportation under division (G) of this section. (B)(1) The manufacturer of an electric bicycle shall ensure that the electric bicycle complies with the equipment and manufacturing requirements for bicycles established by the consumer product safety commission under 16 C.F.R. 1512 et seq. (2) The manufacturer shall manufacture all class 1 electric bicycles and class 3 electric bicycles so that when the rider ceases pedaling the electric motor ceases to provide assistance. The manufacturer shall manufacture all class 2 electric bicycles so that when the rider applies the brakes or releases or activates a switch or similar mechanism the electric motor ceases to provide assistance. (3) All class 3 electric bicycles shall be equipped with a speedometer that displays the speed of the electric bicycle in miles per hour. (C)(1) The operation of a class 1 electric bicycle and a class 2 electric bicycle is permitted on a path set aside for the exclusive use of bicycles or on a shared-use path, unless the county, township, municipal corporation, other local authority, or state agency as defined in section 1.60 of the Revised Code with control over the path by resolution, ordinance, or rule prohibits the use of a class 1 electric bicycle or class 2 electric bicycle on such a path. (2) No person shall operate a class 3 electric bicycle on a path set aside for the exclusive use of bicycles or a shared-use path unless that path is within or adjacent to a highway or the county, township, municipal corporation, or local authority, or state agency as defined in section 1.60 of the Revised Code with control over the path by resolution, ordinance, or rule authorizes the use of a class 3 electric bicycle on such a path. (3) No person shall operate a class 1 electric bicycle, a class 2 electric bicycle, or a class 3 electric bicycle on a path that is intended to be used primarily for mountain biking, hiking, equestrian use, or other similar uses, or any other single track or natural surface trail that has historically been reserved for nonmotorized use, unless the county, township, municipal corporation, other local authority, or state agency as defined in section 1.60 of the Revised Code with control over the path by resolution, ordinance, or rule authorizes the use of a class 1 electric bicycle, a class 2 electric bicycle, or a class 3 electric bicycle on such a path. (4) Divisions (C)(2) and (3) of this section do not apply to a law enforcement officer, or other person sworn to enforce the criminal and traffic laws of the state, using an electric bicycle while in the performance of the officer's duties. (D)(1) No (D)(1)(a) No person who is under sixteen fourteen years of age shall operate an electric bicycle. (b) No person who is fourteen or fifteen years of age shall operate a class 3 electric bicycle; however, a person under sixteen years of age may ride as a passenger on a class 3 electric bicycle that is designed to accommodate passengers. (c) No person who is under eighteen years of age shall operate an electric bicycle while carrying a passenger. (d) No person who is eighteen, nineteen, or twenty years of age shall operate an electric bicycle while carrying a passenger who is under twelve years of age. (2) No person shall operate or be a passenger on a class 3 an electric bicycle unless the person is wearing a protective helmet that meets the standards established by the consumer product safety commission or the American society for testing and materials. (3)(a) No person who is under eighteen years of age shall rent an electric bicycle. (b) No person shall knowingly rent an electric bicycle to a person who is under eighteen years of age. (c) No person shall knowingly rent an electric bicycle on behalf of a person who is under eighteen years of age. (4) No person shall operate an electric bicycle with the motor engaged at a speed greater than ten miles per hour upon an authorized shared-use path under division (C)(1) or (2) of this section or an authorized path as described in division (C)(3) of this section. (E)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever operates an electric bicycle in a manner that is prohibited under division (C) of this section and whoever violates division (D) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. (2) The Unless a mens rea is otherwise specified in this section, the offenses established under division (E)(1) of this section are strict liability offenses and strict liability is a culpable mental state for purposes of section 2901.20 of the Revised Code. The designation of these offenses as strict liability offenses shall not be construed to imply that any other offense, for which there is no specified degree of culpability, is not a strict liability offense. (F)(1) If an offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two or more violations of this section or a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance, the court, in addition to or independent of all other penalties imposed for the violation, may impound the electric bicycle for not more than thirty days. (2) If the court orders the impoundment of the electric bicycle, the court may assess storage fees of not more than five dollars per day, provided the total storage, processing, and release fees assessed in connection with the impoundment or subsequent release shall not exceed fifty dollars. (G) The department of transportation, in consultation with the department of public safety, shall do all of the following: (1) Maintain a summary of the Ohio laws governing the operation and use of electric bicycles; (2) Create videos that explain general traffic rules for operators of electric bicycles; (3) Publish both the summary and the videos on each department's respective web site; (4) Design and distribute to electric bicycle retail sellers and driver training schools, either on paper or electronically, an educational leaflet or pamphlet that does all of the following: (a) Briefly outlines Ohio laws for electric bicycle operators on the road; (b) Distinguishes between an electric bicycle and other similar forms of transportation, including a motorized bicycle or moped, a motor-driven cycle or scooter, an off-highway motorcycle, a motorcycle, and a mini-bike; (c) Contains a link to the summary and training videos available on the department web sites as described in division (G)(3) of this section. Sec. 4511.54. (A) No person riding upon any bicycle, electric bicycle, coaster, roller skates, sled, skateboard, electric personal assistive mobility device, low-speed micromobility device, or toy vehicle shall knowingly attach the same or self to any streetcar, trackless trolley, or vehicle upon a roadway. No operator shall knowingly permit any person riding upon any bicycle, electric bicycle, coaster, roller skates, sled, skateboard, electric personal assistive mobility device, low-speed micromobility device, or toy vehicle to attach the same or self to any streetcar, trackless trolley, or vehicle while it is moving upon a roadway. This section does not apply to the towing of a disabled vehicle. (B)(B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. (2) If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) If an offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two or more violations of this section or a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance, and the offender, in committing each violation, used an electric bicycle, electric personal assistive mobility device, or low-speed micromobility device, the court, in addition to or independent of all other penalties imposed for the violation, may impound the electric bicycle, electric personal assistive mobility device, or low-speed micromobility device for not more than thirty days. (2) If the court orders the impoundment of the electric bicycle, electric personal assistive mobility device, or low-speed micromobility device, the court may assess storage fees of not more than five dollars per day, provided the total storage, processing, and release fees assessed in connection with the impoundment or subsequent release shall not exceed fifty dollars. Section 2. That existing sections 4507.11, 4508.02, 4511.01, 4511.20, 4511.514, 4511.522, and 4511.54 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.